New York, session 2025-2026, A4415.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision a of section 265.20 of the penal law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph 7-g to read as follows: 3 7-g. Possession of a pistol or revolver by a person who has applied to 4 the appropriate licensing officer in Chautauqua county for a license to 5 possess a pistol or revolver and who appears to be eligible to receive 6 such license pursuant to subdivision one of section 400.00 of this chap- 7 ter and where such possession is: (i) of a pistol or revolver owned by a 8 local law enforcement agency; and (ii) at a firearms training facility 9 operated by such agency while under the supervision, guidance and 10 instruction of a police officer during a firearms familiarity, safety, 11 loading and firing course conducted by such agency; provided, however, 12 that this paragraph shall only apply in Chautauqua county and only where 13 such county opts by local law to require such a course before a person 14 may be issued a license pursuant to section 400.00 of this chapter. 15 Prior to a course being conducted by a law enforcement agency pursuant 16 to this paragraph, such course shall be approved by the superintendent 17 of the state police and shall be periodically reviewed by the super- 18 intendent for compliance with applicable rules and regulations. Any 19 course conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall only be operated by a 20 law enforcement agency and shall not be delegated or assigned to any 21 third-party persons or entities. The superintendent of the state police 22 shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07714-01-5 A. 4415 2 1 purposes of this paragraph including standards for the operation of a 2 firearms familiarity, safety, loading and firing course. Nothing in this 3 paragraph shall be read to require approval of the superintendent of the 4 state police for any firearms safety course operated by law enforcement 5 or third-party individuals or entities that does not include the handl- 6 ing, loading or firing of a pistol or revolver. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 8 have become a law, and shall expire and be deemed repealed June 1, 2028.